District of Columbia statutes.
34-802

Quorum; investigations; rules and regulations.

A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum to do business, and any vacancy shall not impair the right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all the powers of the Commission. Any investigation, inquiry, or hearing within the powers of the Commission may be made or held by any commissioner, whose acts and orders, when approved by the Commission, shall be deemed to be the order of the Commission. The Commission shall have power to adopt and publish rules and regulations for the administration of the provisions of this subtitle, including the conduct of its investigations, inquiries, hearings, and other proceedings.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 995, ch. 150, § 8, par. 97(b)
Dec. 15, 1926, 44 Stat. 921, ch. 8, § 1

Cross References

Construction oversight and accounts, see § 34-1116.
Depreciation accounts, see § 34-1115.
Gas and electric meters, inspections, rules and regulations, see § 34-303.
Mayor, council and other officers, police power regulations, see § 1-303.03.
Measurement standards, rules and regulations, § 34-1120.
Public utility accidents, reporting and investigations, see § 34-401.
Rules and regulations, power of Commission to adopt, see § 34-902.
Street railways and bus lines, generally, see § 35-201 et seq.
Utility service, valuation and accounts, Commission oversight of individual rates and dividends, see § 34-1117.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1314.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-403.
1973 Ed., § 43-202.
Editor’s Note Section 2 of An Act to alter the personnel of the Public Utilities Commission of the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, 44 Stat. 921 former § 43-404, 1981 Ed., provided that this section not be construed to invalidate certain acts of the prior Commission including those relating to orders or rules, complaints, inquiries or hearings, actions or proceedings.